Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.510

Modification or termination—Vulnerable adult protection orders.

This section applies to the modification or termination of vulnerable adult protection orders.

(1) Any vulnerable adult who is not subject to an order under chapter 11.130 RCW may, at any time subsequent to the entry of a permanent protection order under this chapter, file a motion to modify or terminate the protection order. Where a vulnerable adult is subject to an order under chapter 11.130 RCW, the vulnerable adult, or the vulnerable adult's guardian, conservator, or person acting on behalf of the vulnerable adult under a protective arrangement under chapter 11.130 RCW, may, if within the person's authority under the guardianship, conservatorship, or protective arrangement, file a motion to modify or terminate the protection order at any time subsequent to the entry of a permanent protection order under this chapter.

(2) In a hearing on a motion to modify or terminate the protection order, the court shall grant such relief consistent with RCW 7.105.310 as it deems necessary for the protection of the vulnerable adult, including modification or termination of the protection order.

[ 2022 c 268 s 24; 2021 c 215 s 63.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2022 c 268: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.